test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ceaggad_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ceägˈgad: # Verb 'to put up/pystyttää' - full paradigm
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ceäggam
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ceäggak
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ceägg    #ceägˈg
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ceäggap    #ceägˈgap
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ceäggveʹted    #ceägˈgveʹted
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ceägga    #ceägˈga
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: ceäggat
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ceägg
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ciâggum    #ciâgˈgum
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ciâgguk    #ciâgˈguk
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ceäggai
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [ceäggaim, ceäggain]
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ceäggaid
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ciâggu    #ciâgˈgu
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: ciâgguš    #ciâgˈguš
     ceäggad+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ceäggam    #ceägˈgam
     ceäggad+V+Pot+Sg1: ceäggžem
     ceäggad+V+Pot+Sg2: ceäggžiǩ
     ceäggad+V+Pot+Sg3: ceäggaž
     ceäggad+V+Pot+Pl1: [ceäggžep, ceäggžim, ceäggžin]
     ceäggad+V+Pot+Pl2: ceäggžid 
     ceäggad+V+Pot+Pl3: ceäggže
     ceäggad+V+Pot+Sg4: ceäggžet
     ceäggad+V+Pot+ConNeg: ceäggže
     ceäggad+V+Cond+Sg1: ceäggčem
     ceäggad+V+Cond+Sg2: [ceäggčiǩ, ceäggčeǩ]
     ceäggad+V+Cond+Sg3: ceäggči
     ceäggad+V+Cond+Pl1: [ceäggčim, ceäggčin, ceäggčep]
     ceäggad+V+Cond+Pl2: ceäggčid
     ceäggad+V+Cond+Pl3: ceäggče
     ceäggad+V+Cond+Sg4: ceäggčeš
     ceäggad+V+Cond+ConNeg: ceäggče
     ceäggad+V+Imprt+Sg2: ceägg
     ceäggad+V+Imprt+Sg3: ceäggas
     ceäggad+V+Imprt+Pl1: ceäggap    #ceägˈgap
     ceäggad+V+Imprt+Pl2: ceäggad    #ceägˈgad
     ceäggad+V+Imprt+Pl3: ceäggaz    #ceägˈgaz
     ceäggad+V+Imprt+ConNeg: ceägg
     ceäggad+V+Imprt+ConNegII: ciâggu    #ciâgˈgu
     ceäggad+V+Actio+Ess: ceäggmen      #ceägˈgmen
     ceäggad+V+Actio: ceäggam      #ceägˈgam
     ceäggad+V+Act+PrsPrc: ceäggai      #ceägˈgai
     ceäggad+V+Act+PrfPrc: ceäggam      #ceägˈgam
     ceäggad+V+Pass+PrfPrc: ciâggum    #ciâgˈgum
     ceäggad+V+VAbess: [ceäggkani, ceäggǩânai, ceäggǩenai, ceäggǩâni, ceäggǩeânai, ceäggǩeânnai, ceäggkâni, ceäggǩani]
     ceäggad+V+Ger+Ess: ceäggeeʹn
     ceäggad+V+Ger+Instr: ceäggeeʹl
